Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1)(a) As part of the development of the  legislatively adopted budget, each
state agency that employs more than 100 employees shall report  to the Joint Committee on
Ways and Means the state agency’s maximum supervisory ratio for the biennium.
(b) Before submitting the report to the committee, a state agency shall provide a copy
of the report to all labor organizations that represent employees of the state agency.
(2) A state agency must determine its maximum supervisory ratio  by starting from a
baseline ratio of one to 11 and adjusting the ratio based  on some or all of the following fac-
tors:
(a) Safety of the public or of state agency employees;
(b) Geographic location of the agency’s employees;
(c) Complexity of the agency’s duties;
(d) Industry best practices and standards;
(e) Size and hours of operation of the agency;
(f) Unique personnel  needs of the agency, including the agency’s use of volunteers or
seasonal or temporary employees, or the exercise of supervisory authority  by agency super-
visory employees over personnel who are not agency employees; and
(g) Financial scope and responsibility of the agency.
(3) The Joint Committee on Ways  and Means shall review the maximum supervisory ra-
tios reported by state agencies. The committee shall  include the maximum supervisory ratio
in a budget report or budget note for each state agency that reported  a maximum supervi-
sory ratio.
(4) Subject to  subsection (5) of this section, a state agency whose actual supervisory ratio
is greater than its maximum supervisory ratio may not fill a supervisory position.
(5)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services  may exempt a state agency
from the limitations of subsection (4) of this section if the department determines that an
additional supervisory position is reasonably necessary to the state agency. The department
must make the determination with reference to some or all of the factors set forth in  sub-
section (2) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 2332 (HB 2332-A) Page 1
(b) At least  five business days before granting an exemption under this subsection, the
department shall notify all labor organizations that represent employees of the state  agency
of its intent to grant the exemption.
(6)(a) The department shall, once per quarter, produce reports  on the actual supervisory
ratio of each state  agency. The reports must include data on job families within each state
agency to the extent such data is reasonably available.
(b) The department shall make the reports  publicly available on the Internet and shall
notify all labor organizations that represent state employees when the reports  are available.
(7) The department may adopt rules for the administration of this section, including rules
governing how temporary, seasonal or part-time employees are accounted for in  the calcu-
lation of a supervisory ratio.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) “Job families” means groups of occupations based upon work performed,  skills, edu-
cation, training and credentials.
(b) “Legislatively adopted budget” has the meaning given that term in ORS 291.002.
(c)(A) “State agency” means  all state officers, boards, commissions, departments, insti-
tutions, branches, agencies, divisions and other  entities, without regard to the designation
given to those  entities, that are within the executive branch of government as described in
Article III, section 1, of the Oregon Constitution.
(B) “State agency” does not include:
(i) The legislative department as defined in ORS 174.114;
(ii) The judicial department as defined in ORS 174.113;
(iii) The Public Defense Services Commission;
(iv) The Secretary of State and the State Treasurer;
(v) Semi-independent state agencies listed in ORS 182.454;
(vi) The Oregon Tourism Commission;
(vii) The Oregon Film and Video Office;
(viii) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002;
(ix) The Oregon Health and Science University;
(x) The Travel Information Council;
(xi) Oregon Corrections Enterprises;
(xii) The Oregon State Lottery Commission;
(xiii) The State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation;
(xiv) The Oregon Utility Notification Center;
(xv) Oregon Community Power;
(xvi) The Citizens’ Utility Board;
(xvii) A special government body as defined in ORS 174.117;
(xviii) Any other public corporation created under a statute of this state and  specifically
designated as a public corporation; and
(xix) Any other semi-independent state agency denominated by statute as a  semi-
independent state agency.
(d) “Supervisory employee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 243.650.
(e) “Supervisory ratio” means the  ratio of employees who are supervisory employees to
employees who are not supervisory employees.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 291.204, as amended by section  14, chapter 117, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
291.204. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services, by July 1 of each even-numbered
year, shall furnish every state agency with :
(a) Instructions for preparing for submission to the Governor the information required by the
Governor in the preparation of the Governor’s budget[ .]; and
(b) Instructions  for preparing the proposed maximum supervisory ratio report required
by section 1 (1) of this 2017 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2332 (HB 2332-A) Page 2
(2) The Governor shall prescribe the instructions to  be used by the agencies in submitting their
agency request budgets as required by ORS 291.208.
SECTION 3. ORS 291.229 and 291.231 and section 2, chapter 622, Oregon Laws 2015, are
repealed.
SECTION 4. Section 1 of this 2017 Act and the amendments to ORS 291.204 by section 2
of this 2017 Act apply to budgets for biennia beginning on or after July 1, 2019.
Passed by House May 16, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 1, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2332 (HB 2332-A) Page 3